Georgia, session 2025_26, HB850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes" means all ad valorem taxes levied by, for, or on behalf of the
Augusta-Richmond County for consolidated government purposes, except for any ad
valorem taxes levied to pay interest on and to retire bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Adjusted base year assessed value" means the sum of:
(A) The previous adjusted base year assessed value;
H. B. 850
- 1 -

LC 61 0249/AP
(B) An amount equal to the difference between the current year assessed value of the
homestead and the base year assessed value of the homestead, provided that such
amount shall not exceed the total of the previous adjusted base year assessed value of
the homestead multiplied by 3.2 percent; and
(C) The value of any substantial property change, provided that no such value added
improvements to the homestead shall be duplicated as to the same addition or
improvement.
(3) "Base year assessed value" means:
(A) With respect to an exemption under this section which is first granted to a person
on such person's homestead for the 2026 taxable year, the assessed value for taxable
year 2025, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code
Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A., of the homestead; or
(B) In all other cases, the assessed value, including any final determination of value on
appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A., of the homestead from the
taxable year immediately preceding the taxable year in which the exemption under this
section is first granted to the applicant.
(4) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended; provided, however, that if the property is assessed pursuant
to Code Section 48-5-7.4 or 48-5-7.7 of the O.C.G.A., only the primary residence and the
portion of the underlying property that is excluded from the benefit of such assessment
pursuant to subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of Code Section 48-5-7.4 of the O.C.G.A. or
subparagraph (b)(2)(B) of Code Section 48-5-7.7 of the O.C.G.A shall be included.
(5) "Previous adjusted base year assessed value" means:
(A) With respect to the year for which the exemption under this section is first granted
to a person on such person's homestead, the base year assessed value; or
(B) In all other cases, the adjusted base year assessed value of the homestead as
calculated in the taxable year immediately preceding the current year, including any
H. B. 850
- 2 -

LC 61 0249/AP
final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311 of the
O.C.G.A.
(6) "Substantial property change" means any increase or decrease in the assessed value
of a homestead derived from additions or improvements to, or the removal of real
property from, the homestead which occurred after the year in which the base year
assessed value is determined for the homestead. The assessed value of the substantial
property changes shall be established following any final determination of value on
appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A.
(b)(1) Subject to the limitations provided in this section, each resident of
Augusta-Richmond County is granted an exemption on that person's homestead from ad
valorem taxes in an amount equal to the amount by which the current year assessed value
of that homestead, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code
Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A., exceeds its previous adjusted base year assessed value.
(2) Except as provided for in subsection (c) of this section, no exemption provided for
in this subsection shall transfer to any subsequent owner of the property, and the assessed
value of the property shall be as provided by law.
(c) No person shall receive the exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section unless
such person or person's agent files an application with the tax commissioner of
Augusta-Richmond County as will enable the tax commissioner to make a determination
regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such person for such exemption; provided,
however, that any person who had previously applied for a homestead exemption, was
allowed such homestead exemption for the 2025 tax year, and remains eligible for a
homestead exemption for that same homestead property in the 2026 tax year shall be
automatically allowed the exemption granted under subsection (b) of this section for that
homestead without further application. The tax commissioner shall provide application
forms for this purpose.
H. B. 850
- 3 -

LC 61 0249/AP
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the tax commissioner of Augusta-Richmond County in the event that
such person for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption. The unremarried
surviving spouse of the person who has been granted the exemption provided for in
subsection (b) of this section shall continue to receive the exemption provided under
subsection (b) of this section, so long as that unremarried surviving spouse continues to
occupy the home as a residence and homestead.
(e)(1) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect
any state ad valorem taxes, county or independent school district ad valorem taxes for
educational purposes, or municipal ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the homestead
exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu
of any other homestead exemption applicable to ad valorem taxes.
(3) The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not be
applied in addition to any other base year value homestead exemption provided by law
with respect to Augusta-Richmond County. In any such event, the Augusta-Richmond
County tax commissioner shall apply only the base year value homestead exemption that
is larger or more beneficial for the taxpayer with respect to Augusta-Richmond County.
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
H. B. 850
- 4 -

LC 61 0249/AP
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
100 SECTION 3.
101 The election superintendent of Augusta-Richmond County shall call and conduct an election
102 as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
103 Augusta-Richmond County for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall
104 conduct that election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, 2025, and
105 shall issue the call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The election
106 superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week
107 for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of
108 Augusta-Richmond County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
109 "( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from
110 Augusta-Richmond County ad valorem taxes for consolidated government
111 ( ) NO purposes in an amount equal to the amount by which the current year
112 assessed value of a homestead exceeds the adjusted base year assessed
113 value, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to
114 Code Section 48-5-311 of the O.C.G.A., as amended, of such homestead?"
115 All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
116 to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
117 such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
118 effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
119 as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
120 be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
121 in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by Augusta-Richmond County.
H. B. 850
- 5 -

LC 61 0249/AP
122 It shall be the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of
123 State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and
124 are not intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with
125 this section, any elector of Augusta-Richmond County may apply for a writ of mandamus
126 to compel the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the
127 court finds that the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall
128 fashion appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such
129 election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
130 elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
131 SECTION 4.
132 Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
133 its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
134 SECTION 5.
135 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 850
- 6 -